Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2529
Direct access to services.

The public may have direct access to occupational therapy services.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 127;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6121;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 869.